tests/roundunround.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "үөскээ":
    үөскээ<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : үөскүүр
    үөскээ<v><iv><ger1> : үөскүөн
    үөскээ<v><iv><prc_impf> : үөскүү

  "туораа":
    туораа<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : туоруур
    туораа<v><iv><ger1> : туоруон
    туораа<v><iv><prc_impf> : туоруу
